Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.250

Surplus computer equipment—Donation to schools.

The chief clerk of the house of representatives may authorize surplus computers and computer-related equipment owned by the house, the secretary of the senate may authorize surplus computers and computer-related equipment owned by the senate, and the directors of legislative agencies may authorize surplus computers and computer-related equipment owned by his or her respective agency, to be donated to school districts and educational service districts. This section shall not be construed to limit the discretion of the legislature regarding disposal of its surplus property.

[ 1999 c 186 s 2.]